Georgia, session 2025_26, HB821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to bonds and recognizances, is amended in subsection (a) of Code
Section 17-6-1, relating to when offenses bailable, procedure, schedule of bails, and appeal
bonds, by revising paragraphs (13) and (14) and by adding a new paragraph to read as
follows:
"(13) Violating Code Section 16-5-46; and
(14) Violations of Chapter 15 of Title 16; and
(15) Aggravated assault upon a public safety officer while he or she is engaged in, or on
account of the performance of, his or her official duties by the discharge of a firearm."
H. B. 821
- 1 -

LC 48 1581
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 821
- 2 -